Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.044

Services and activities fees—Legislative declaration on expenditure.

It is the intent of the legislature that students will propose budgetary recommendations for consideration by the college or university administration and governing board to the extent that such budget recommendations are intended to be funded by services and activities fees. It is also the intent of the legislature that services and activities fee expenditures for programs devoted to political or economic philosophies shall result in the presentation of a spectrum of ideas.

[ 1986 c 91 s 1; 1980 c 80 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1980 c 80: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1980 c 80 s 4.]